Hawaii statutes.
[§353-136] Automated victim
information and notification system special fund; authorization of payment.
(a) There is established a special fund to be known as the automated victim
information and notification system special fund, to be administered by the
department. Interest and investment earnings credited to the assets of the
fund shall become part of the fund. Any remaining balance in the fund at the
end of any fiscal year shall be carried over to the next fiscal year.

(b) Any item purchased by an in-state or
out-of-state inmate from a correctional facility commissary shall be subject to
a four per cent surcharge on the item's price. The proceeds from the surcharge
shall be deposited into the automated victim information and notification system
special fund.

(c) All proceeds or revenues that are derived
from any commission that is realized pursuant to a telephone service agreement
executed by the department for the provision of telephone services for inmates
shall be deposited into the automated victim information and notification
system special fund.

(d) Moneys received pursuant to subsections
(b) and (c) shall be used for the development and operating expenses, including
salaries and benefits of positions as authorized by the legislature, of the
system.

(e) The sum total of all moneys expended for
development and operating expenses, including salaries and benefits of
positions as authorized by the legislature, shall not exceed the special fund
ceiling related to the fund established by the legislature; provided that the
total moneys expended for these purposes shall not exceed $600,000 in any one
fiscal year.

(f) Federal funds shall not be transferred to,
or deposited into, the automated victim information and notification system
special fund. [L 2012, c 190, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next